Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6705XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 2178 Section 1. Section 483A.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. A person who should attain the age of 3 sixty-five at any point during the calendar year in which the 4 person applies is eligible for any lifetime hunting, fishing, 5 or fur harvester license issued by the department that requires 6 the applicant to have attained the age of sixty-five. 7